District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.06

Bathrooms.

(a)

An ALR shall ensure that there is one full bathroom, for every 6 residents, including live-in family or staff. Additional full or half baths shall be available to non-live-in staff. No resident shall be required to traverse more than one flight of stairs to access a bathroom and appropriate accommodations shall be made for residents who are unable to climb stairs.

(b)

When applicable, bathrooms shall contain adequate space and strategically located grab bars to allow residents who use wheelchairs to utilize toilets, tubs, showers, and wash basins without traversing a stair way.

(c)

An ALR shall insure that the temperature of the hot water at all taps to which residents have access is controlled by the use of thermostatically controlled mixing valves or by other means, including control at the source, so that the water temperature does not exceed 110 degrees Fahrenheit.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1006, 47 DCR 2647
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 27(d), 59 DCR 5567
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “residents who use wheelchairs” for “wheelchair-bound residents” in (b).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.